dev/sah.lat-cyrl.lexc
Multichar_Symbols 

%<n%> 

%[
%]
%-
%=

LEXICON Root 

Alpha ; 
Punct ; 
Digits ;

LEXICON AlphaLoop 

Alpha ;
%=:0 Alpha "weight: 1.0" ; 
%-:0 AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
 # ;

LEXICON Alpha


ü:ü AlphaLoop "weight: 10.0" ; 
ö:ö AlphaLoop "weight: 10.0" ; 
ï:ï AlphaLoop "weight: 10.0" ; 
y:y AlphaLoop "weight: 10.0" ; 
x:x AlphaLoop "weight: 10.0" ; 
v:v AlphaLoop "weight: 10.0" ; 
u:u AlphaLoop "weight: 10.0" ; 
t:t AlphaLoop "weight: 10.0" ; 
s:s AlphaLoop "weight: 10.0" ; 
r:r AlphaLoop "weight: 10.0" ; 
q:q AlphaLoop "weight: 10.0" ; 
p:p AlphaLoop "weight: 10.0" ; 
o:o AlphaLoop "weight: 10.0" ; 
n:n AlphaLoop "weight: 10.0" ; 
m:m AlphaLoop "weight: 10.0" ; 
l:l AlphaLoop "weight: 10.0" ; 
k:k AlphaLoop "weight: 10.0" ; 
j:j AlphaLoop "weight: 10.0" ; 
i:i AlphaLoop "weight: 10.0" ; 
h:h AlphaLoop "weight: 10.0" ; 
g:g AlphaLoop "weight: 10.0" ; 
f:f AlphaLoop "weight: 10.0" ; 
e:e AlphaLoop "weight: 10.0" ; 
d:d AlphaLoop "weight: 10.0" ; 
c:c AlphaLoop "weight: 10.0" ; 
b:b AlphaLoop "weight: 10.0" ; 
a:a AlphaLoop "weight: 10.0" ; 
!kh:x AlphaLoop "weight: 10.0" ;
!kh:kh AlphaLoop "weight: 10.0" ;
!sh:š AlphaLoop "weight: 10.0" ;
!sh:sh AlphaLoop "weight: 10.0" ;
!ch:č AlphaLoop "weight: 10.0" ;
!ch:ch AlphaLoop "weight: 10.0" ;
%]:0 AlphaLoop "weight: 10.0" ; 
%[:0 AlphaLoop "weight: 10.0" ; 

LEXICON Digits 

<[%0 | 1 | 2 | 3 | 4 | 5 | 6 | 7 | 8 | 9]+> # ;

LEXICON Punct

%.:%. # ; 
%-:%- # ; 
%,:%, # ; 
%;:%; # ; 
%::%: # ; 
%!:%! # ; 
%?:%? # ; 
%“:%“ # ; 
%”:%” # ; 
%«:%« # ; 
%»:%» # ; 
%(:%( # ; 
%):%) # ; 
%–:%– # ; 
